Arkansas statutes. Title 2 Agriculture
Chapter 35

Marketing, Sale, and Transportation

Subchapter 3

— Arkansas Beef Council

Subchapter 1

— General Provisions

Preambles. Acts 1973, No. 317 contained a preamble which read:

“Whereas, the distribution of state funds to county and district fair associations for paying premiums and awards at county fairs has heretofore been made based on that part of the total funds appropriated for the purpose that the population of the county bears to the total population of all counties in which qualifying associations are located irrespective of the size and quality of the fair held in such county and this has resulted in a wide variation in the amounts of state funds received by the various associations and a discrepancy over the state in the amount an award winner receives for an entry; and

“Whereas, the county and district fairs stand as a medium for the exchange of ideas and methods and should develop on the concept of an agricultural and industrial ‘convention’ and should provide encouragement and stimulation to the Arkansas agricultural, industrial, and livestock industries; and the state should recognize achievement and provide incentive for improvement in the quality of county fairs by the disbursement of state funds on a graded basis of fair quality;

“Now therefore … .”

Effective Dates. Acts 1973, No. 317, § 14: Mar. 13, 1973. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the present method of disbursing state funds appropriated for the development of agricultural, industrial and livestock industries in the state is based upon the population of the county in which county fairs are held; that it is in the best interests of the state that such funds be disbursed to the participating fairs on the basis of grade of quality of the fair, thereby recognizing achievement and providing incentive for improvement in the quality of the fairs; and that this act is designed to accomplish this purpose and should be given effect immediately. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1989 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 192, § 32: July 1, 1989. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Seventh General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the appropriation of funds for more than a two (2) year period; that the effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 1989 is essential to the operation of the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in the event of an extension of the Regular Session, the delay in the effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 1989 could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1989.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

2-36-101. Grading of fairs.

The Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission may formulate necessary and appropriate rules for the grading of fairs on a point system in cooperation with an ad hoc advisory committee formed of representatives of agriculture consisting of representatives from the United States Department of Agriculture, the University of Arkansas Cooperative Extension Service, the Office of Agricultural Science and Technology of the Division of Career and Technical Education, and the Arkansas Fair Managers Association, which shall make recommendations as to criteria for the allotment of grade points to the commission.

The advisory committee shall determine the entry classifications for which grade points would be allowed and delete from approval such classifications as beauty contests, baby shows, antique shows, skills contests, purchased machinery such as cars and farm equipment, or other noncreative categories which in their opinion would be nonproductive and not in accord with the concept of an agricultural and industrial convention.

Amendments. The 2011 amendment substituted “Department of Career Education” for “Department of Workforce Education” in (a).

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Career and Technical Education” for “Department of Career Education” in (a).

History.

Acts 1973, No. 317, §§ 6, 7; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 78-1615, 78-1616; Acts 1999, No. 1323, § 1; 2011, No. 776, § 2; 2019, No. 910, § 1032.

2-36-102. Exhibitors.

An exhibitor shall be a single person who enters a display in the fair. Each unit shall not be construed as an exhibitor, but a person may be counted as an exhibitor in each classification in which he or she has an entry.

History.

Acts 1973, No. 317, § 8; A.S.A. 1947, § 78-1617.

2-36-103. Sale of immoral, lewd, etc., items.

Any facilities which house county, district, or state fairs shall prohibit the sale of literature, pictures, clothing, or other materials which are immoral, lewd, obscene, indecent, or offensive. The prosecuting attorney shall be notified of any proposed sales of such material.

History.

Acts 1989 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 192, § 19.

Subchapter 2

— Funding Generally

Preambles. Acts 1973, No. 317 contained a preamble which read:

“Whereas, the distribution of state funds to county and district fair associations for paying premiums and awards at county fairs has heretofore been made based on that part of the total funds appropriated for the purpose that the population of the county bears to the total population of all counties in which qualifying associations are located irrespective of the size and quality of the fair held in such county and this has resulted in a wide variation in the amounts of state funds received by the various associations and a discrepancy over the state in the amount an award winner receives for an entry; and

“Whereas, the county and district fairs stand as a medium for the exchange of ideas and methods and should develop on the concept of an agricultural and industrial ‘convention’ and should provide encouragement and stimulation to the Arkansas agricultural, industrial, and livestock industries; and the state should recognize achievement and provide incentive for improvement in the quality of county fairs by the disbursement of state funds on a graded basis of fair quality;

“Now therefore … .”

Effective Dates. Acts 1973, No. 317, § 14: Mar. 13, 1973. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the present method of disbursing state funds appropriated for the development of agricultural, industrial and livestock industries in the state is based upon the population of the county in which county fairs are held; that it is in the best interests of the state that such funds be disbursed to the participating fairs on the basis of grade of quality of the fair, thereby recognizing achievement and providing incentive for improvement in the quality of the fairs; and that this act is designed to accomplish this purpose and should be given effect immediately. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

2-36-201. Administration.

The Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission shall be empowered and authorized to administer the provisions of this subchapter and adopt rules as it may deem necessary.

History.

Acts 1973, No. 317, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 78-1610.

2-36-202. Premium funds generally.

Premium funds appropriated by the General Assembly for the purpose of assisting in the development of the agricultural, livestock, and related industries of the state shall be disbursed and, thereafter, expended by the county and district livestock show or fair associations in the manner and for the purposes provided in this subchapter.

History.

Acts 1973, No. 317, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 78-1610.

2-36-203. Premium funds for state fair.

The Arkansas Livestock Show Association shall be entitled to receive the total amount of funds appropriated by the General Assembly for the purpose of paying premiums at the Arkansas State Fair and Livestock Show after qualifying by the filing of an application with the Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission and furnishing bond to the State of Arkansas in such form and amount and containing such conditions therein and type of surety thereon as the commission shall by general rules determine.

Premium funds paid over to the association shall be used only for the purpose of paying awards on approved entry classifications, the exhibitors of which are residents of this state.

The association may pay awards on livestock to nonresident owners in an amount not in excess of ten percent (10%) of any premium funds received by it from an appropriation for the purpose of paying awards at the Arkansas State Fair and Livestock Show.

None of the funds may be used for paying premiums at or for acquiring sites for the district shows.

No state funds may be paid over to any district association unless and until the executive officer shall have furnished bond to the State of Arkansas in such form and amount and containing such conditions and type of surety as the Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission shall by general rule determine.

(1)Funds appropriated by the General Assembly to be used for construction and operation of the Arkansas State Fair and Livestock Show shall be disbursed upon orders of the commission.

If in any year the show is operated at a loss, then funds appropriated for this purpose by the General Assembly shall be used to the extent necessary to maintain the balance in the fund account at the full amount of the initial deposit.

The commission shall designate the disbursing officers of all livestock show funds appropriated by the General Assembly.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “rule” for “regulation” in (a)(2).

History.

Acts 1973, No. 317, § 10; A.S.A. 1947, § 78-1619.

2-36-204. Division of funds among counties and districts.

(1)Each county and district livestock show or fair association qualifying shall be entitled to that part of the total funds appropriated for the purpose that the qualifying grade points earned by that county for the previous year bear to the total grade points of all counties in which all qualifying associations are located.

No county shall receive less than five hundred dollars ($500).

(1)Counties having more than one (1) city or town in which regular sessions of circuit court are authorized by law and in which livestock shows have been held, if otherwise qualified, may participate in the county premium funds on the same basis as other county shows.

Associations located in two (2) or more adjoining counties may hold a joint show upon approval of their respective associations, in which event, the funds due each association shall be paid to the executive officer of the joint show.

History.

Acts 1973, No. 317, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 78-1614.

2-36-205. Use of premium funds.

(1)Premium funds paid over by the Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission to the respective associations shall be used only for the purpose of paying awards on approved entry classifications, the exhibitors of which are residents of this state.

Exhibitors are ineligible to receive such funds from more than one (1) county association during any fiscal year.

Not less than twenty-five percent (25%) of premium funds paid over by the state to the respective associations shall be used for paying premiums to winners of awards in the junior division of 4-H and FFA shows.

History.

Acts 1973, No. 317, § 9; A.S.A. 1947, § 78-1618.

2-36-206. Appropriations for construction and operation.

(1)(A)Funds appropriated by the General Assembly to be used for construction of a district livestock show shall be paid over to the executive officers of the respective district livestock show or fair associations.

The operating revolving fund set aside in a special account to be used for operating expenses in conducting the livestock show shall continue to be set aside for that purpose. All profits from the operation of the show shall be deposited into this account to the extent necessary to maintain the balance at the full amount of the initial deposit.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 20, §§ 2, 3; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 78-1605, 78-1606; Acts 2019, No. 315, § 21.

2-36-207. Applications for funds.

Each county and district livestock show or fair association desiring to participate in funds appropriated for a given fiscal year for the purpose of paying premiums on qualified entries as defined in this subchapter shall file an application during the month of June next preceding the fiscal year with the Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission.

(1)The application shall include a complete report on the prior year's fair activities with regard to fair dates, exhibitors, classifications, amount of association funds paid as premiums over and above state funds, and any and all other information requested by the commission which it may deem necessary in order to classify and grade the fair.

The president, secretary, treasurer, or other executive officer of the association shall make application on forms to be prescribed and furnished by the commission.

Only those applications received before the close of business on June 30 shall be considered by the commission in making allocation of funds appropriated for that purpose for the following fiscal year.

History.

Acts 1973, No. 317, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 78-1612.

2-36-208. Bonding of executive officers.

No state funds may be paid over to any county and district livestock show or fair association unless and until the executive officer shall have furnished bond to the State of Arkansas in such form and amount and containing such conditions and type of surety as the Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission shall by general rule determine.

History.

Acts 1973, No. 317, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 78-1611; Acts 2019, No. 315, § 22.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “rule” for “regulation”.

2-36-209. Determination of bond and fund amounts.

Within sixty (60) days after the closing date for the receipt of applications for funds, the Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission shall determine the amount of bond which the executive officer shall furnish and the amount of premium funds to which each county and district livestock show or fair association is entitled in accordance with the provisions of this subchapter.

The state warrant issued in favor of each association for the amount found to be due shall be transmitted to the executive officer thereof upon receipt by the commission of a bond executed in conformity with its requirements.

The commission shall require that all documentation for the prior year's expenditures by an association be filed in compliance with subsections (a) and (b) of this section before the making of any further grants for premiums or construction to these associations.

Effective Dates. Acts 1981, No. 770, § 27: July 1, 1981. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Third General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the appropriation of funds for more than a two (2) year period; that the effectiveness of this act on July 1, 1981 is essential to the operation of the agency for which the appropriations of this act are provided, and that in the event of an extension of the Regular Session, the delay in the effective date of this act beyond July 1, 1981 could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and providing of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1981.”

Acts 1987, No. 554, § 2: Apr. 2, 1987. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the present law relating to the Northeast Arkansas District Fair is unduly burdensome and in need of revision; that the revision should go into effect immediately; that unless this emergency clause is adopted this Act will not go into effect until ninety days after extended recess or adjournment of the General Assembly. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1991, No. 1105, § 31: July 1, 1991. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Eighth General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the appropriation of funds for more than a two (2) year period; that the effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 1991 is essential to the operation of the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in the event of an extension of the Regular Session, the delay in the effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 1991 could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1991.”

Acts 2003, No. 1288, § 33: July 1, 2003. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the appropriation of funds for more than a two (2) year period; that the effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 2003 is essential to the operation of the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in the event of an extension of the Regular Session, the delay in the effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 2003 could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 2003.”

Acts 2011, No. 116, § 2: Feb. 23, 2011. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that Independence County has made the decision to move to a different district fair; that the Northeast Arkansas District Fair needs to be able to ensure that its operations continue to run in an efficient manner; and that this act is immediately necessary because the Northeast Arkansas District Fair Board and executive board need to be able to make the necessary preparations and advise the participants, vendors, and community of changes in a timely manner. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2011, No. 131, § 5: Feb. 24, 2011. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that district fairs prepare for activities all year long and require insurance for their activities; that moving Independence County to the North Central Arkansas District Fair and Livestock Show in Izard County will require preparation and insurance, as well as other financial preparations; and that this act is immediately necessary because the North Central Arkansas District Fair and Livestock Show needs the legal authority to act to properly finance the change, procure the necessary insurance, and meet other financial responsibility requirements to incorporate Independence County into its district fair. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

After each federal decennial census, the membership on the board shall be reapportioned among the counties listed in subsection (a) of this section in such manner as to reflect the proportionate population of each county relating to the district as a whole.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Subdivision (b)(1) originally began “The Northeast Arkansas District Fair shall be held in Jonesboro, Arkansas, through calendar year 1992.”

Subdivision (b)(2) originally began “For calendar year 1993 and thereafter.”

Subdivision (a)(1) was amended by both Acts 2011, No. 116, § 1, and No. 131, § 1. While the amendment by Acts 2011, No. 131, § 1, only concerned the removal of Independence County from the Northeast Arkansas District Fair Advisory Board, the amendment by Acts 2011, No. 116, § 1, made the same removal of Independence County from the Northeast Arkansas District Fair Advisory Board but also made other substantive changes to (a)(1). Given that the only substantive change made to subdivision (a)(1) by Acts 2011, No. 131, § 1, was also made by Acts 2011, No. 116, § 1, but Acts 2011, No. 116, § 1, made additional substantive changes, subdivision (a)(1) is set out above as amended by Acts 2011, No. 116, § 1, effective July 27, 2011. The amendment made to subdivision (a)(1) by Acts 2011, No. 131, § 1, read as follows:

“(a)(1)There is created the Northeast Arkansas District Fair Advisory Board, to be composed of twenty-nine (29) members:

“(A)Five (5) members from Mississippi County;

“(B)Four (4) members from Craighead County;

“(C)Two (2) members from Greene County;

“(D)One (1) member from Clay County;

“(E)Three (3) members from Crittenden County;

“(F)Two (2) members from St. Francis County;

“(G)One (1) member from Cross County;

“(H)Two (2) members from Poinsett County;

“(I)Two (2) members from Jackson County;

“(J)One (1) member from Lawrence County;

“(K)One (1) member from Randolph County;

“(L)One (1) member from Lee County;

“(M)One (1) member from Woodruff County; and

“(N)Three (3) members from White County.”

Amendments. The 2011 amendment by No. 116 rewrote (a)(1); substituted “Northeast Arkansas District Fair Advisory Board” for “board” at the end of (a)(2)(B) and twice in (a)(3); added (a)(2)(C); deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in (b)(1); and rewrote (b)(2).

The 2011 amendment by No. 131 substituted “twenty-nine (29)” for “thirty-one (31)” in the introductory language of (a)(1); deleted (a)(1)(J) and redesignated the remaining subdivisions accordingly.

History.

Acts 1973, No. 317, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 78-1613.

2-36-210. Audits of expenditures.

(1)The executive officer of each county, district, and state livestock show or fair association shall file an itemized listing of all expenditures of state funds with the Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission in a format developed by the commission.

Upon request by the commission, the executive officer of each county, district, and state livestock show or fair association shall present to the commission adequate documentation supporting listed expenditures.

Arkansas Legislative Audit may audit all expenditures of state funds paid over to the executive officers of the respective county, district, and state livestock show or fair association and file a copy of the report of each audit with the commission.

History.

Acts 1973, No. 317, § 11; A.S.A. 1947, § 78-1620; Acts 2001, No. 619, § 1.

2-36-211. Accounting reports by recipients.

(1)Each county and district livestock show or fair association participating in funds appropriated for paying premiums or appropriated for construction purposes at the various county, district, and fair associations shall annually submit to the Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission an itemized listing of all expenditures.

In addition, the association shall file with the commission the original invoices, contracts, and other supporting documents necessary to adequately support the claim for the amount of funds received from the commission for construction programs.

(1)For those expenditures representing premiums and awards payments, the receiving association shall file with the commission a detailed listing of payees, amounts, and classifications of awards and cancelled checks in support thereof.

The documentation of expenditures as set forth in this section shall be maintained by the commission until audited by Arkansas Legislative Audit.

History.

Acts 1975, No. 545, §§ 1, 2; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 78-1610.1, 78-1610.2.

Subchapter 3

— County and District Shows or Fairs

2-36-301. Northwest Arkansas District Fair and Livestock Show.

There is established a district livestock show to be known as the “Northwest Arkansas District Fair and Livestock Show” to be located in Boone County, and to be managed by the existing livestock show association which manages and conducts the county livestock show in that county.

Counties composing the Northwest Arkansas District Fair and Livestock Show district shall be Boone County, Newton County, Marion County, Baxter County, Searcy County, and Carroll County.

The Northwest Arkansas District Fair and Livestock Show shall enjoy the same privileges and status as the four (4) previously established district livestock shows in the State of Arkansas.

History.

Acts 1961, No. 334, §§ 1-3; 1963, No. 243, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 78-1607 — 78-1609.

2-36-302. Northeast Arkansas District Fair Advisory Board.

(1)There is created the Northeast Arkansas District Fair Advisory Board, to be composed of the following members:

One (1) member from Mississippi County;

One (1) member from Craighead County;

One (1) member from Greene County;

One (1) member from Clay County;

One (1) member from Crittenden County;

One (1) member from St. Francis County;

One (1) member from Cross County;

One (1) member from Poinsett County;

One (1) member from Jackson County;

One (1) member from Lawrence County;

One (1) member from Randolph County;

One (1) member from Lee County;

One (1) member from Woodruff County; and

One (1) member from White County.

(A)The county fair board of each county shall select the person from that county to be a member of the board.

If any county does not have a county fair board, the county judge of that county shall appoint that county's representative to the board.

(i)There is created an executive board that shall be composed of the members of the county fair board of the county in which the Northeast Arkansas District Fair is located.

The executive board shall be responsible for the day-to-day operations and maintenance of the Northeast Arkansas District Fair fairgrounds.

Members of the board shall serve four-year terms, and any vacancies arising in the board membership shall be filled in the same manner as were the original appointments.

(1)In all matters, the fair shall be subject to the rules of the Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission and otherwise conducted in the same manner as other district fairs.

The location of the Northeast Arkansas District Fair shall be in Craighead County.

The board shall annually select a chair from among its membership.

History.

Acts 1983, No. 746, §§ 1, 2; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 78-1625, 78-1626; Acts 1987, No. 554, § 1; 1999, No. 99, § 1; 2011, No. 116, § 1; 2011, No. 131, § 1.

2-36-303. Annual joint fair and livestock shows by adjoining counties.

(1)Any two (2) or more adjoining counties in the state are authorized to enter into an agreement for and to conduct an annual joint fair and livestock show.

(A)The agreement for a joint fair and livestock show shall be executed in writing by the county fair and livestock show association board of each of the participating counties.

The agreement shall designate the location at which the annual joint fair and livestock show is to be conducted and shall contain such other provisions regarding the joint fair and livestock show as the boards of the respective participating county fair and livestock show associations shall deem necessary or appropriate to assure the proper and efficient conduct of the joint fair and livestock show.

(1)When any two (2) or more adjoining county fair or livestock show associations conduct a joint fair and livestock show as authorized in this section, funds appropriated by the state for county livestock show construction shall be allocated and paid by the disbursing officer of the Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission to the executive officer of each participating county association the same as if each county were conducting a separate fair and livestock show.

Construction funds received by each executive officer shall be transmitted to the appropriate official of the joint fair and livestock show to be used exclusively for construction of facilities for conducting the joint fair and livestock show.

(1)(A)Each joint fair and livestock show conducted under the provisions of this section shall be graded and awarded qualifying grade points the same as if it were a single county show for the purposes of the allocation of state funds appropriated for premiums for county livestock shows.

The amount of such funds allocated and distributed to any such joint fair and livestock show by the disbursing officer of the commission shall be based upon the qualifying grade points earned by the joint show.

(A)In addition to the premium funds so allocated to the joint show on the basis of qualifying grade points, each participating county other than the county in which the joint show is located shall be eligible to receive from state funds appropriated for county livestock show premiums the amount of five hundred dollars ($500), which shall be paid annually by the disbursing officer of the commission to the executive officer of each participating county fair association the same as if each county were conducting a separate fair and livestock show.

Premium funds received by each executive officer shall be transmitted to the appropriate official of the joint fair and livestock show to be used exclusively for premiums at the joint fair and livestock show.

History.

Acts 1983, No. 172, §§ 1-3; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 78-1622 — 78-1624.

2-36-304. Participation by nonresident landowner.

In the event any individual owns land in two (2) adjacent counties and the county in which he or she resides does not conduct a county livestock show, the individual shall be deemed to be eligible to participate in the county livestock show conducted in the county in which he or she owns land but does not reside.

History.

Acts 1981, No. 770, § 19; A.S.A. 1947, § 78-1621.

Cross References. Bond required for nonresident livestock auctioneer, §17-17-304.

2-36-305. District junior livestock shows.

A junior livestock show is authorized for each of the six (6) livestock show districts of the state.

Any organization desiring to establish a district junior livestock show shall make application and submit proposed organizational and operational plans for the district junior livestock show to the Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission.

The commission may approve only one (1) district junior livestock show in each of the six (6) livestock show districts.

Funds appropriated to the commission for district junior livestock shows shall be distributed equally to all district junior livestock shows.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Former §2-36-305, concerning district junior livestock shows, is deemed to be superseded by this section. The former section was derived from Acts 1989 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 192, § 20. A similar provision which was also codified as §2-36-305, and was previously superseded, was derived from Acts 1987, No. 1055, § 4.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2007, No. 272, § 1, provided: “Act 57 Compliance. The General Assembly declares this act to be in concordance with the study of the state's system of public education conducted in 2006 by the Adequacy Study Oversight Subcommittee, the House Interim Committee on Education, and the Senate Interim Committee on Education in compliance with Act 57 of the Second Extraordinary Session of 2003.”

Acts 2007, No. 272, § 9, provided: “The document attached hereto titled ‘Education Funding Recommendations for the 2007-2009 Biennium’, contains the Education Funding Recommendations of the Adequacy Study Oversight Subcommittee, the House Interim Committee on Education, and the Senate Interim Committee on Education. Since January 22, 2007, when those recommendations were adopted by the House Education Committee and the Senate Education Committee, some calculation errors were identified and recalculations were made. The recalculations are also contained in this document in narrative form. This document and its final recommendations are specifically adopted by the House Education Committee and the Senate Education Committee and recommended to the General Assembly. The document, ‘Education Funding Recommendations for the 2007-2009 Biennium’, shall be filed in the journals of the House and Senate.”

Acts 2011, No. 131, § 4, provided:

“(a)Within thirty (30) days after the effective date of this act, the two (2) new members of the North Central Arkansas District Fair Board from Independence County shall be selected as provided under Arkansas Code §2-36-306(d)(1).

“(b)The terms of the two (2) new members of the board from Independence County shall be:

“(1)Staggered in sequence with the expiration dates of the board members that held the position on the effective date of this act to avoid the terms of the two (2) new members expiring in the same year; and

“(2)Determined by lot.

“(c)(1)If necessary to avoid the terms of the two (2) new members of the board from Independence County expiring in the same year, the terms of the initial two (2) new members may be for a period of less than four (4) years.

“(2)Subsequent appointments to the board from Independence County shall be for a period of four (4) years.”

The effective date of Acts 2011, No. 131, is February 24, 2011.

Amendments. The 2011 amendment inserted “Independence County” in (b); substituted “fourteen (14)” for “twelve (12)” in (d)(1); and deleted the last sentence in (d)(2).

The Arkansas counties of Benton, Conway, Crawford, Franklin, Johnson, Logan, Perry, Polk, Pope, Scott, Sebastian, Washington, and Yell; and

In Oklahoma:

The counties of Adair, Cherokee, Haskell, Latimer, LeFlore, and Sequoyah that shall have exhibits counted for premium points but shall not receive Arkansas state funds; and

The counties of Delaware, McCurtain, McIntosh, Muskogee, Pittsburg, and Wagoner that shall not be counted for premium points or receive Arkansas state funds.

(1)The fair shall commence each year no later than the third Friday following Labor Day.

The fair shall enjoy the same privileges as previously established district fairs and livestock shows in the State of Arkansas.

There is created the Arkansas-Oklahoma District Fair Board to produce and administer the fair.

The board shall be composed of:

The District Fair Committee appointed by the Arkansas-Oklahoma Regional Education and Promotion Association, Inc.; and

At the option of each county fair among the Arkansas fairs in the district, one (1) member from each fair appointed by the respective fairs.

The board shall operate at the discretion of the members.

A.C.R.C. Notes. As enacted by Acts 1997, No. 726, this chapter principally follows the Uniform Feed Act.

Publisher's Notes. Former Chapter 37, concerning commercial feedstuffs, was repealed by Acts 1997, No. 726, § 18. The chapter was derived from the following sources:

2-37-101. Acts 1951, No. 108, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 78-702.

2-37-102. Acts 1969, No. 49, §§ 1, 2; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 78-719, 78-720.

2-37-103. Acts 1951, No. 108, §§ 12, 13; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 78-714, 78-715.

2-37-104. Acts 1951, No. 108, § 14; A.S.A. 1947, § 78-716.

2-37-105. Acts 1951, No. 108, §§ 10, 11; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 78-711, 78-712.

2-37-106. Acts 1951, No. 108, § 1; 1953, No. 66, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 78-701.

2-37-107. Acts 1967, No. 439, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 78-718.

2-37-108. Acts 1951, No. 108, §§ 3, 4; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 78-703, 78-704.

2-37-109. Acts 1951, No. 108, § 9; A.S.A. 1947, § 78-710.

2-37-110. Acts 1951, No. 108, § 15; A.S.A. 1947, § 78-717.

2-37-111. Acts 1951, No. 108, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 78-705.

2-37-112. Acts 1951, No. 108, § 7; A.S.A. 1947, § 78-707.

2-37-113. Acts 1951, No. 108, § 8; A.S.A. 1947, § 78-709.

2-37-114. Acts 1951, No. 108, § 6; 1979, No. 120, § 1; 1983, No. 238, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 78-706; Acts 1993, No. 783, §§ 5, 6.

ALR.

Products liability for animal feed or medicines. 29 A.L.R.4th 1045.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 1105, § 18; 2003, No. 1288, § 28.

2-36-306. North Central Arkansas District Fair and Livestock Show.

There is established a district livestock show to be known as the “North Central Arkansas District Fair and Livestock Show” and to be located in Izard County.

Counties composing the North Central Arkansas District Fair and Livestock Show district shall be Cleburne County, Fulton County, Independence County, Izard County, Sharp County, Stone County, and Van Buren County.

The North Central Arkansas District Fair and Livestock Show shall enjoy the same privileges and status as previously established district livestock shows in the State of Arkansas.

(1)There is created the North Central Arkansas District Fair Board, to be composed of fourteen (14) members. Two (2) members shall be selected from each county. One (1) member in each county shall be selected by the livestock show association in the county, and one (1) shall be selected by the Arkansas Farm Bureau Federation.

The members of the board shall serve four-year terms. Any vacancies arising in the board membership shall be filled in the same manner as were the original appointments.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 881, § 1; 1999, No. 99, § 2; 2001, No. 358, § 1; 2011, No. 131, §§ 2, 3.